Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Article 5. Rates, Records, Reports, etc.

§ 56-35.
Regulation of public service companies.

The Commission shall have the power, and be charged with the duty, of supervising, regulating and controlling all public service companies doing business in this Commonwealth, in all matters relating to the performance of their public duties and their
charges therefor, and of correcting abuses therein by such companies.

History.
Const., § 156, par. (b); Code 1919, § 3709; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 38; 1973, c. 377.

Cross references.

For constitutional provision as to power of State Corporation Commission, see Va. Const., Art. IX, § 2.

As to powers of the State Corporation Commission generally, see §§

12.1-12

through

12.1-17

.

Law Review.

For article analyzing ratemaking issues under the SCC, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 601 (1973).

For special section on ratemaking and public policy in Virginia, see 18 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 73 (1976).

For 2000 survey of Virginia property law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 981 (2000).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
3B M.J. Carriers, § 23; 7A M.J. Eminent Domain, § 11; 15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, §§ 2, 21; 15 M.J. Railroads, § 11.

§ 56-36.
Inspection of books and documents; special reports; rules and regulations to prevent unjust discrimination.

The Commission shall also have the right at all times to inspect the books, papers and documents of all public service companies doing business in this Commonwealth, and to require from such companies, from time to time, special reports and statements,
under oath, concerning their business. It shall keep itself fully informed of the physical condition of all railroads of the Commonwealth, as to the manner in which they are operated, with reference to the security and accommodation
of the public, and shall, from time to time, make and enforce such requirements, rules and regulations as may be necessary to prevent unjust or unreasonable discrimination by any public service company in favor of, or against, any
person, locality, community, connecting line, or kind of traffic in the matter of car service, train or boat schedule, efficiency of transportation or otherwise, in connection with the public duties of such company.

History.
Const., § 156, par. (b); Code 1919, § 3710; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 38.

Cross references.

As to power of Commission to revise rates, etc., see § 56-542.

§ 56-37.
Regulation of services performed under municipal or county franchise.

Nothing in § 56-36 shall impair the right which has heretofore been, or may hereafter be, conferred by law upon the authorities of any city, town or county to prescribe rules, regulations or rates of charge to be observed by any public service corporation
in connection with any services performed by it under a municipal or county franchise granted by such city, town or county, so far as such services may be wholly within the limits of the city, town or county granting the franchise.

History.
Const., § 156, par. (b); Code 1919, § 3712; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 39.

Cross references.

As to the granting of franchises generally, see §

15.2-2100

et seq.

§ 56-38.
Adjustment of claims and controversies.

Upon the request of the parties interested, it shall be the duty of the Commission, as far as possible, to effect, by mediation, the adjustment of claims, and the settlement of controversies, between public service companies and their employees and patrons.

History.
Const., § 156, par. (b); Code 1919, § 3713; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 24.

§ 56-39.
Repealed by Acts 1995, c. 647.

§ 56-40.
Reduction of rates and charges.

The Commission, in the exercise of its discretion, may permit any public utility corporation to put into effect any proposed revision of its rate schedules, or any part thereof, without notice when the proposed revision effects no increases.

History.
1928, p. 726; Michie Code 1942, § 4065a.

Law Review.

For article analyzing ratemaking issues under the SCC, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 601 (1973).

For special section on ratemaking and public policy in Virginia, see 18 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 73 (1976).

§ 56-41.
Repealed by Acts 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 39.

§ 56-41.1.
Rates and charges for use of poles by telephone cooperatives, mutual telephone associations and small investor-owned telephone utilities.

The General Assembly has determined that the joint use of poles by electric light, heat and power companies, telephone cooperatives, mutual telephone associations and small investor-owned telephone utilities is in the public interest and should be encouraged
to the maximum extent possible.

The terms and rates for the joint use of poles by electric light, heat and power companies, telephone cooperatives, mutual telephone associations and small investor-owned telephone utilities shall be by agreement between the parties. In the event that
the terms and rates cannot be agreed upon by the interested parties, it shall be the duty of the Commission to determine and establish such terms and the rates to be paid for joint use.

History.
1989, c. 605.

§ 56-42.
Repealed by Acts 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 39.

§ 56-43.
Examination of public service company; notice; fines and penalties.

Upon the complaint and application of the mayor or council of any city or town or the board of supervisors or other governing body of any county within which any part of any public service company is located, it shall be the duty of the Commission to
make an examination of the physical condition and operation thereof. Before proceeding to make such examination in accordance with such application, the Commission shall give to the applicants and the corporation or person operating
any such line reasonable notice in writing of the time and place of entering upon the same. If upon such examination it shall appear to the Commission that the complaint alleged by the applicant is well founded, it shall so adjudge
and shall notify such corporation or person of its adjudication; and, if such corporation or person fails for sixty days after such notification to remove the cause of complaint, the Commission shall impose the fines and penalties
provided by law for its failure to obey the orders and requirements of the Commission and enforce the collection thereof by its judgments and processes.

History.
Code 1919, § 3721; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 39.

Cross references.

As to other provisions as to fines, penalties and power to enforce orders, see §§

12.1-13

through

12.1-15

, 56-140, 56-446.